Utah statutes.
38-8-2.   Lien against stored property -- Attachment and duration -- Search
for financing statement prerequisite to enforcement of lien.
(1)  Where a rental agreement, as defined in Subsection 38-8-1(6), is entered
into between the owner and the occupant, the owner of the self-service storage
facility and the owner's heirs, executors, administrators, successors, and
assigns have a lien upon all personal property located at the self-service
storage facility for rent, labor, or other charges, present or future, in
relation to the personal property and for expenses necessary for its
preservation or expenses reasonably incurred in its sale or other disposition
under this chapter.
(2)  The lien described in Subsection (1) attaches as of the date the personal
property is brought to the self-service storage facility and continues so long
as the owner retains possession and until any default is corrected, or a sale
pursuant to a default is conducted, or the property is otherwise disposed of
to satisfy the lien.
(3) (a)  Before taking enforcement action under Section 38-8-3, the owner
shall determine if a financing statement filed in accordance with Title 70A,
Chapter 9a, Part 5, Filing, has been filed with the Division of Corporations
and Commercial Code concerning the property to be sold or otherwise disposed
of.
(b)  A security interest evidenced by a financing statement filed in
accordance with Title 70A, Chapter 9a, Part 5, Filing, has priority over the
lien provided by this section.
